Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 78. Rehabilitation and Liquidation.
Sec. 21.78.297.
Reopening liquidation.

After the liquidation proceeding has been terminated and the receiver discharged, the director or an interested party may at any time petition the court to reopen the proceedings for good cause, including the discovery of additional assets.
If the court is satisfied that there is justification for reopening, it shall order the liquidation proceeding reopened.

History.

(§ 80 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.298.
Disposition of records during and after termination of liquidation.

If it appears to the director that the records of an insurer that is in the process of liquidation, or is completely liquidated, are no longer useful, the director may recommend to the court, and the court shall direct, which records should be retained for future reference and which should be destroyed.

History.

(§ 80 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.300.
Report and petition for assessment.

Within three years after the date of the entry of an order of rehabilitation or liquidation of a domestic mutual insurer or a domestic reciprocal insurer, the director may make and file a report and petition to the court setting out

the reasonable value of the assets of the insurer;

the liabilities of the insurer to the extent thus far ascertained by the director;

the aggregate amount of the assessment, if any, that the director considers reasonably necessary to pay all claims, the costs and expenses of the collection of the assessments, and the costs and expenses of the delinquency proceedings in full;

other information relative to the affairs or property of the insurer that the director considers material.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.310.
Order and levy of assessment.

Upon the filing and reading of the report and petition provided for in AS

21.78.300

, the court, ex parte, may order the director to assess all members or subscribers of the insurer who may be subject to the assessment, in the aggregate amount the court finds reasonably necessary to pay all valid claims as may be timely filed and proved in the delinquency proceedings, together with the costs and expenses of levying and collecting assessments and the costs and expenses of the delinquency proceedings in full. The order must require the director to assess each member or subscriber for a proportion of the aggregate assessment, according to the reasonable classification of the members or subscribers and formula that may be made by the director and approved by the court.

The court may order additional assessments upon the filing and reading of any amendment or supplement to the report and petition referred to in (a) of this section, if the amendment or supplement is filed within three years after the date of the entry of the order of rehabilitation or liquidation.

After the entry of the order to levy and assess members or subscribers of an insurer referred to in (a) or (b) of this section, the director shall levy and assess members or subscribers in accordance with the order.

The total of all assessments against a member or subscriber with respect to a policy, whether levied under this chapter or under another provision of this title, shall be for no greater amount than that specified in the policy or policies of the member or subscriber and as limited under this title, except as to a policy that was issued at a rate of premium below the minimum rate lawfully permitted for the risk insured, in which event the assessment against the policyholder shall be upon the basis of the minimum rate for the risk.

An assessment may not be levied against a member or subscriber with respect to a nonassessable policy issued in accordance with this title, when the insurer has a nonrevoked authority to issue nonassessable policies.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.320.
Assessment prima facie correct.

An assessment of a subscriber or member of an insurer made by the director under the order of court fixing the aggregate amount of the assessment against all members or subscribers and approving the classification and formula made by the director under AS

21.78.310

shall be prima facie correct.

Each member or subscriber shall be notified of the amount of assessment to be paid by the member or subscriber by written notice mailed to the address of the member or subscriber last of record with the insurer. Failure of the member or subscriber to receive the notice so mailed, within the time specified therein for the payment of the assessment or at all, shall be no defense in a proceeding to collect the assessment.

If the member or subscriber fails to pay the assessment within the period specified in the notice, which period may not be less than 20 days after mailing, the director may obtain an order in the delinquency proceedings requiring the member or subscriber to show cause at a time and place fixed by the court why judgment should not be entered against the member or subscriber for the amount of the assessment together with all costs, and a copy of the order and a copy of the petition shall be served upon the member or subscriber within the time and in the manner designated in the order.

If the subscriber or member after due service of a copy of the order and petition referred to in (c) of this section is made upon the member or subscriber

fails to appear at the time and place specified in the order, judgment shall be entered against the member or subscriber as prayed for in the petition; or

appears in the manner and form required by law in response to the order, the court shall hear and determine the matter and enter a judgment in accordance with its decision.

The director may collect the assessment through any other lawful means.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.325.
Recovery from affiliates.

If an order for liquidation or rehabilitation of a domestic insurer has been entered, the receiver appointed under the order has a right to recover on behalf of the insurer (1) from a parent corporation or holding company or person or affiliate who otherwise controlled the insurer, the amount of distributions, other than a distribution of shares of the same class of stock, paid by the insurer on the insurer’s capital stock; or (2) a payment in the form of a bonus, termination settlement, or extraordinary lump sum salary adjustment made by the insurer or the insurer’s subsidiary to a director, officer, or employee. If the distribution or payment is made during the 12 months preceding the petition for liquidation, conservation, or rehabilitation, the distribution or payment is subject to the limitations of (b) — (d) of this section.

A distribution may not be recovered if the parent or affiliate shows that when paid the distribution was lawful and reasonable and that the insurer did not know and could not reasonably have known that the distribution might adversely affect the ability of the insurer to fulfill its contractual obligations.

A person who was a parent corporation or holding company or a person who otherwise controlled the insurer or affiliate at the time the distribution was paid is liable up to the amount of the distribution or payment that the person received. If two or more persons are liable with respect to the same distribution, the persons are jointly and severally liable.

The maximum amount recoverable under this section is the amount needed in excess of all other available assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer to pay the contractual obligations of the impaired or insolvent insurer and to reimburse any guaranty funds that expended funds or incurred expenses or may expend funds or may incur expenses in connection with the impaired or insolvent insurer.

To the extent that a person liable under (c) of this section is insolvent or otherwise fails to pay a claim due under (c) of this section, the person’s parent corporation or holding company or person who otherwise controlled the parent corporation or holding company at the time the distribution was paid is jointly and severally liable for the resulting deficiency in the amount recovered from the parent corporation or holding company or the person who otherwise controlled the parent corporation or holding company.

History.

(§ 210 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.78.330.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“delinquency proceeding” means a proceeding commenced against an insurer under this chapter for the purpose of liquidating, rehabilitating, reorganizing, or conserving the insurer;

“domiciliary state” means the state in which an insurer is incorporated or organized, or in the case of an insurer incorporated or organized in a foreign country, the state in which the insurer, having become authorized to do business in the state, has at the commencement of delinquency proceedings, the largest amount of its assets held in trust and assets held on deposit for the benefit of its policyholders or policyholders and creditors in the United States, and the insurer is considered to be domiciled in that state;

“foreign country” means territory not in a state;

“general assets” means all property, real, personal, or otherwise, not specifically mortgaged, pledged, deposited, or otherwise encumbered for the security or benefit of specified persons or a limited class or classes of persons, and as to the specifically encumbered property the term includes all the property or its proceeds in excess of the amount necessary to discharge the sum or sums secured thereby; assets held in trust and assets held on deposit for the security or benefit of all policyholders or all policyholders and creditors in the United States shall be considered general assets;

“impairment” or “insolvency” means that the capital of a stock insurer or the surplus of a mutual or reciprocal insurer shall be considered to be impaired and the insurer shall be considered to be insolvent, when the insurer is not possessed of assets at least equal to all liabilities and required reserves together with its total issued and outstanding capital stock if a stock insurer, or the minimum surplus if a mutual or reciprocal insurer required by this title to be maintained for the kind or kinds of insurance it is then authorized to transact;

“insurer” means a person, firm, corporation, association, or aggregation of persons doing an insurance business and subject to the insurance supervisory authority of or to liquidation, rehabilitation, reorganization, or conservation by the director or the equivalent insurance supervisory official of another state;

“preferred claim” means a claim with respect to which the law of the state or of the United States accords priority of payments from the general assets of the insurer;

“receiver” means receiver, liquidator, rehabilitator, or conservator as the context may require;

“reciprocal state” means a state other than this state in which in substance and effect the provisions of the Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act, as defined in AS

21.78.200

, are in force, including the provisions requiring that the director of insurance or equivalent insurance supervisory official be the receiver of a delinquent insurer;

“secured claim” means a claim secured by mortgage, trust deed, pledge, deposit as security, escrow, or otherwise, but not including special deposit claims or claims against general assets; the term also includes claims which more than four months prior to the commencement of delinquency proceedings in the state of the insurer’s domicile have become liens upon specific assets by reason of judicial process;

“special deposit claim” means a claim secured by a deposit made under statute for the security or benefit of a limited class or classes of persons, but not including general assets;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 85 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 75 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 1984 to alphabetize the defined terms. In 1991, former paragraphs (2)-(13) were renumbered as (1)-(12) to reflect the repeal of former paragraph (1).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (12), inserted “the Commonwealth of” preceding “Puerto Rico”, and made stylistic changes.